New Jersey, session 222, S3584.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 3 of P.L.2012, c.45 (C.18A:65-94) is amended to read as follows: 3.    a.  In order to carry out the purposes of this act and to provide the program of medical and dental education required for the benefit of the State and the people of New Jersey, all rights to all of the schools, institutes, and centers of the University of Medicine and Dentistry of New Jersey, other than the School of Osteopathic Medicine, the entire Stratford campus, the remaining facilities in Camden, and University Hospital, are hereby transferred to Rutgers, The State University. The facilities of the schools, institutes, and centers of the University of Medicine and Dentistry of New Jersey, other than the facilities of the School of Osteopathic Medicine, the entire Stratford campus, the remaining facilities in Camden, and University Hospital, are hereby transferred to Rutgers, The State University, and the university shall devote the same to the purposes of public higher education in the State in accordance with the terms of any gift, grant, trust, contract or other agreement with the State or any of its political subdivisions or with the United States or with any public body, department or any agency of the State or the United States or with any individual, firm or corporation. Upon the transfer of the schools, institutes, and centers of the University of Medicine and Dentistry of New Jersey to Rutgers, The State University, the Cancer Institute of New Jersey shall become an independent institute at Rutgers, The State University and shall be distinct and separate from any individual school. b.    Rutgers, The State University shall maintain the public mission and commitment of the University of Medicine and Dentistry of New Jersey, including an affiliation with University Hospital, to provide a comprehensive healthcare program and services to the greater Newark community, including outreach and mobile health services and services provided collaboratively between University Hospital and the University of Medicine and Dentistry of New Jersey, or any of its components. c.     Any school, institute, or center transferred to Rutgers, The State University pursuant to subsection a. of this section based in the City of Newark shall remain in the City of Newark, including the New Jersey Medical School, the New Jersey Dental School, School of Health Related Professions, the School of Nursing, and the Public Health Research Institute. d.    Any school, institute, or center of Rutgers, The State University based in Middlesex County shall remain in Middlesex County including, but not limited to, the Robert Wood Johnson Medical School, the School of Public Health, the Ernest Mario School of Pharmacy, the Institute of Health, Health Policy, and Aging Research, and University Behavioral Healthcare. e.     Rutgers, The State University shall assume and maintain existing contracts through expiration with the Department of Corrections and the Department of Children and Families to provide services under University Behavioral Healthcare and the School of Nursing. [The services provided under the contracts shall continue to be provided by public employees following expiration of those contracts] Upon expiration of the contracts in effect on the effective date of P.L.    , c.   (pending before the Legislature as this bill) under which University Behavioral Healthcare and the School of Nursing provide services, the Department of Corrections and the Department of Children and Families may award the contracts for such services to the vendors whose proposals are most advantageous to the State, price and other factors considered. f.     Whenever, in any law, rule, regulation, order, contract, document, judicial or administrative proceeding or otherwise, reference is made to the University of Medicine and Dentistry of New Jersey, other than the School of Osteopathic Medicine, the entire Stratford campus, the remaining facilities in Camden, and University Hospital, the same shall mean and refer to Rutgers, The State University. g.    The transfer of the schools, institutes, and centers of the University of Medicine and Dentistry of New Jersey, other than the School of Osteopathic Medicine, the entire Stratford campus, the remaining facilities in Camden, and University Hospital, to Rutgers, The State University shall require the accreditation approval of the appropriate accrediting bodies prior to transfer. (cf: P.L.2012, c.45, s.3) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately. STATEMENT Current law requires the Department of Corrections (DOC) and Department of Children and Families (DCF) to ensure certain medical and dental services are provided by public employees.  This provision limits the qualified vendors from which these services may be procured and increases costs to the State. This bill revises the States procurement process for certain medical and dental contracts to increase efficiency and quality.  This bill will provide DOC and DCF with the ability to award contracts for medical and dental services to the vendors whose proposals are most advantageous to the State, price and other factors considered, in order to reduce the States health care costs.